Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3319.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-6 of the General Laws entitled "Ordinances" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
45-6-13. Hotel, motel, inn, boardinghouse, or catering establishment – Application;
approval.
The city of East Providence, is hereby authorized and empowered to provide, by ordinance,
for the discretionary issuance and revocation of licenses to any person or business entity seeking to
engage in the business of operating a hotel, motel, inn, boardinghouse, or catering establishment,
to establish reasonable fees for the issuance and revocation, and to promulgate, by ordinance,
reasonable rules and regulations as to the duration, location, number, and operation of those licenses
within the city. Prior to issuance of a license by the city clerk, pursuant to this section, any person
or business entity seeking to engage in the business of operating a hotel, motel, inn, boardinghouse,
or catering establishment shall first obtain approval of the chief of police, the building inspector
and the mayor.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006529
========